Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1332.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Light rail construction; state participation; prohibition; report; delayed repeal; definitions A. On or before December 31, 2027, the auditor general, in coordination with an independent transportation research entity, shall conduct a comprehensive feasibility review of light rail expansion in Maricopa county and submit a report on their findings. The report shall be submitted to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and a copy shall be provided to the secretary of state and to the mayor of Phoenix and each member of the Phoenix city council. The comprehensive feasibility review may not presume the superiority of any mode of transit and shall include: 1. Capital and operating cost comparisons between a light rail and autonomous or semi-autonomous transit vehicles, including bus rapid transit, passenger vans and shuttle systems. 2. A comparison of the environmental impact per dollar invested for acquiring, constructing and operating a light rail. 3. Analysis of the long-term economic benefits and costs between light rail and autonomous or semi-autonomous transit vehicles, including bus rapid transit, passenger vans and shuttle systems. 4. Flexibility, scalability and adaptability to population shifts. 5. Long-term maintenance and replacement costs. 6. Policy recommendations regarding future state involvement in light rail construction. 7. Analysis of whether continuation, modification or discontinuation of state participation in light rail expansion is warranted. 8. The short-term economic effects of construction on small and locally owned businesses located within or adjacent to proposed transit corridors. 9. An evaluation to the extent to which construction activity may impair visibility, access, parking availability, pedestrian traffic and vehicular traffic to affected businesses and that shall estimate the potential for lost revenue, workforce reductions, relocation or business closure during the construction period. B. This act is repealed from and after June 30, 2028. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Light rail construction" means the planning, permitting or physical construction of new fixed-guideway rail transit lines or extensions. 2. "State participation" means any of the following: (a) Appropriating state monies. (b) Issuing state bonds or guarantees. (c) Approving, certifying or matching monies by the department of transportation. (d) Approving state permits or other authorizations.